Oklahoma, session 2025, SB956.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 20 O.S. 2021, Section 92i, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 92i. To file as a candidate for the office of district
judge or associate district judge, one must have been a registered
voter and actual resident of the appropriate county district for at
least six (6) months prior to the first day of the filing period.
Should no one file for any such office, and should a vacancy thereby
created be filled by appointment according to law, there shall be no
such residency or durational registration requirement imposed on the
appointee, providing said the appointee is otherwise qualified, nor
shall any person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of
district judge or associate district judge be required to comply
with such the residency or durational registration requirement in
ENGR. S. B. NO. 956 Page 1

beco ming a candidate for a full term following such an appointment.
No one who has been removed from judicial office or who has resigned
from office pending disciplinary proceedings shall qualify to file
as a candidate for judicial office.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives










ENGR. S. B. NO. 956 Page 2